Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-380.01
Indigent outpatient; prescription medicine; Department of Health and Human Services; pay costs; when.

Upon the discharge from a treatment facility, an indigent person who has received mental-health-board-ordered treatment may file an affidavit with the Department of Health and Human Services or the mental health board requesting that prescription medicine which the regional center treating psychiatrist or the patient's treating physician has prescribed as necessary for the patient's mental health treatment be provided to him or her. Such affidavit shall include the following: (1) That the patient qualifies as an indigent person who is unable to pay under the same standards of ability to pay as set forth in sections 83-363 to 83-379; and (2) that such prescription medicine has been prescribed by the regional center's treatment psychiatrist or the patient's treating physician as necessary for the patient's mental health treatment. The mental health board shall refer such requests it receives to the Department of Health and Human Services and the department shall provide such prescription medicine as may be necessary for such former patient's mental health treatment so long as he or she remains an outpatient and his or her treating physician continues to prescribe and certify that such prescription medicine is necessary for the patient's mental health treatment and he or she continues to be an indigent person as determined under the same standards of ability to pay as set forth in sections 83-363 to 83-379. The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, including, but not limited to, hearings necessary to determine whether such person is qualified to receive such medications and whether such medication is necessary for the patient's mental health treatment.

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 951;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 41.
July 18, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.